Illinois, session 104th, HB4098.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Educational Choice for Illinois Children Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) Section 1 of Article X of the Illinois Constitution 8provides that "[a] fundamental goal of the People of the State 9is the educational development of all persons to the limits of 10their capacities.". However, the State has failed to meet this 11goal. According to the 2024 National Assessment of Educational 12Progress (NAEP), 62% of 4th graders in the State were below 13proficient in mathematics, and 68% of 8th graders in the State 14were below proficient in mathematics. In reading, 70% of 4th 15graders were below proficient, and 67% of 8th graders were 16below proficient.17    (2) H.R.1 of the 119th Congress (The One Big Beautiful 18Bill Act) was recently signed into law. It offers a federal tax 19credit of up to $1,700 for individuals who donate to 20Scholarship Granting Organizations, thereby increasing funding 21for these organizations to help families pay for their 22children to attend the K-12 school of their choice. The list of 23eligible educational expenses includes tuition, fees,   HB4098- 2 -LRB104 14516 HLH 27656 b1tutoring, educational therapies, transportation, technology, 2and other expenses for children attending public schools, 3private schools, and home schools.4    (3) Illinois experienced great success with its own tax 5credit program, the Invest in Kids Act, which was allowed to 6expire at the end of 2023. According to the Department of 7Revenue, over 40,940 scholarships were awarded during the time 8that the Invest in Kids Act was active. Failure to opt into the 9provisions of the One Big Beautiful Bill Act would place 10Illinois at a competitive disadvantage with surrounding states 11that are likely to opt into the school choice provisions of the 12One Big Beautiful Bill Act.13    (4) The ability to choose where your child goes to school 14should not be a privilege reserved for the wealthy. Too many 15students are trapped in an educational learning environment 16that fails to meet their needs, and the financial burden of 17attending a different school is too often out of reach. 18Scholarships from scholarship granting organizations under the 19One Big Beautiful Bill Act can help alleviate this financial 20burden for families that could not otherwise afford private 21school and would result in no additional cost to the State. 22    (5) It is the purpose of this Act to support school choice 23in the State of Illinois by directing the Department of 24Revenue and the State Board of Education to develop a list of 25scholarship granting organizations to which qualified 26contributions may be made under Section 70411 of the One Big   HB4098- 3 -LRB104 14516 HLH 27656 b1Beautiful Bill Act.  2    Section 10. List of scholarship granting organizations. By 3January 1, 2026, the State Board of Education, in coordination 4with the Department of Revenue, shall establish and approve a 5list of scholarship granting organizations that meet the 6requirements of Section 70411 of the One Big Beautiful Bill 7Act to facilitate opting the State of Illinois into the school 8choice tax credit provisions of the One Big Beautiful Bill 9Act. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.